New York, session 2025-2026, S7712.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. Dog control officers of the village of Holley, who at the 4 discretion of the village board may be designated as constables for the 5 purpose of enforcing article twenty-six of the agriculture and markets 6 law and for the purpose of issuing appearance tickets permitted under 7 article seven of such law; provided, however, that nothing in this 8 subdivision shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, 9 repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor 10 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11855-01-5